Oklahoma, session 2026, SB255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Agricultural damage” means the negative impact caused by


the presence and activities of feral swine. For the purposes of


this section, agricultural damage includes, but is not limited to,


crop destruction, pasture damage, soil erosion, damage to


infrastructure, and disease transmission;


2. “Ecological impacts” means the negative effects of feral


swine on natural ecosystems. For the purposes of this section,


ecological impacts include, but are not limited to, crop damage,

Req. No. 519 Page 1


habitat destruction, soil and water contamination, and disruption of


native wildlife;


3. “Feral swine” means the same as defined in Section 6-603 of


Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. “Qualified expenses” means feral swine removal equipment.


For the purposes of this section, feral swine removal equipment


includes, but is not limited to, drop nets, rooter gates, panel


traps, remote-controlled or camera-operated traps, portable traps,


suppressors, silencers, thermal or night-vision equipment, or any


tool or device specifically designed to capture, trap, or remove


feral swine;


5. “Remove” means to change the location of, eliminate, or


attempt to eliminate feral swine by a variety of methods including,


but not limited to, hunting, killing, taking, trapping, and


catching; and


6. “Taxpayer” means a natural person, general partnership,


limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited


liability limited partnership, limited liability company,


corporation, trust, estate, or any other lawfully recognized entity.


B. For tax year 2025 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes equal to seventy percent (70%) of


the cost of qualified expenses used to control and manage feral



Req. No. 519 Page 2


swine populations, minimize agricultural damage caused by feral


swine, or mitigate ecological impacts caused by feral swine.


C. The credit authorized by this section may be claimed by:


1. A natural person or persons. In order for the credit to be


claimed by a natural person or persons, the aggregate amount of land


owned by the natural person or persons must be twenty (20) acres or


more and a copy of the Schedule F filed with the federal income tax


return for either the same taxable year for which the credit


authorized by this section is being claimed or a copy of the


Schedule F for the most recent federal income tax year for which a


federal income tax return was filed shall be submitted with the


claim for the credit; or


2. A lawfully recognized business entity including, but not


limited to, a general partnership, limited partnership, limited


liability limited partnership, corporation, or limited liability


company if the claim for the credit is based on expenditures


incurred by the business entity as otherwise provided by this


section, the entity holds title to real property used primarily for


agricultural purposes, and the aggregate amount of land owned by the


business entity is twenty (20) acres or more. The credit authorized


by this section may not be claimed by a business entity engaged in


the business of hunting, trapping, or removing feral swine for a


fee.



Req. No. 519 Page 3


D. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to


reduce the income tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero


(0).


E. No taxpayer shall claim the credit otherwise authorized by


this section for an amount in excess of Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00) with respect to all taxable years.


F. To the extent not used, the credit authorized by this


section shall be allowed to carry over, in order, to each of the


five (5) following taxable years.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-519 MR 12/30/2024 6:06:53 PM

























Req. No. 519 Page 4